Illinois, session 104th, SB1529.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Section 1-9.1 and by adding Section 11-9 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1-9.1)7    Sec. 1-9.1. Ballot counting information dissemination. 8    (a) Each election authority shall maintain maintaining a 9website and shall must provide 24-hour notice on its website 10of the date, time, and location of the analysis, processing, 11and counting of all ballot forms. Each election authority 12shall must notify any political party or pollwatcher of the 13same information 24 hours before the count begins if such 14political party or pollwatcher has requested to be notified. 15Notification may be by electronic mail at the address provided 16by the requester.17    (b) Each election authority shall post election results on 18its website, including district data for every electoral 19district under the election authority's jurisdiction, even if 20the election authority only has jurisdiction over part of the 21electoral district. The State Board of Elections shall provide 22guidelines to election authorities concerning the online 23reporting of election results.  SB1529- 2 -LRB104 09992 SPS 20062 b1(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.) 2    (10 ILCS 5/11-9 new)3    Sec. 11-9. Name standardization.4    (a) The State Board of Elections shall implement a 5standard naming convention for election districts, precincts, 6and polling places to streamline the reporting of election 7results. As part of implementing the standard naming 8convention, the State Board of Elections shall adopt 9guidelines for election authorities to follow when naming 10election districts, precincts, and polling places. The 11guidelines shall require each election district, precinct, and 12polling place to have a standard identification and a 13human-readable name.14    (b) Every election authority shall use the guidelines 15adopted under subsection (a) to name election districts, 16precincts, and polling places. Every election authority shall 17submit the names to the State Board of Elections no less than 18120 days before the 2026 General Primary Election.19    (c) The State Board of Elections shall amend the names of 20any election district, precinct, or polling place that does 21not conform with the guidelines adopted under subsection (a). 22The State Board of Elections shall send those amended names to 23the election authority as soon as practicable.24    (d) No less than 75 days before the 2026 General Primary 25Election, all election districts, election precincts, and   SB1529- 3 -LRB104 09992 SPS 20062 b1polling places shall be named in accordance with the 2guidelines adopted under subsection (a).3    (e) For every election subsequent to the 2026 General 4Primary Election, every election authority and the State Board 5of Elections shall name election districts, precincts, and 6polling places in a manner similar to the process described in 7subsections (b) and (c). The State Board of Elections may 8adopt rules to implement this subsection.9    (f) If the requirements of this Section conflict with any 10specific provision of this Code, the requirements of this 11Section prevail.